North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 14A. North Carolina Mobility Fund. [Repealed]

§§ 136-187 through 136-189.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-183, s. 4.9, effective July 1, 2013.

History.

S. 136-187; 2010-31, s. 28.7(a); repealed by 2013-183, s. 4.9, effective July 1, 2013. s. 136-188; 2010-31, s. 28.7(a); 2012-42, s. 4; 2012-142, s. 24.8(a); repealed by 2013-183, s. 4.9, effective July 1, 2013. s. 136-189; 2010-31, s. 28.7(a); repealed by 2013-183, s. 4.9, effective July 1, 2013.

§§ 136-189.1 through 136-189.9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.